Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1824
Authority; issuance of bonds authorized.

The authority may issue bonds of the authority for any of its corporate purposes and fund or refund the same pursuant to the Nebraska Elementary and Secondary School Finance Authority Act.

Laws 1997, LB 809, § 24.